<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89811-0019 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.8-11-89.f2.A1018</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 54, No. 154 / Friday, August 11, 1989/ Rules and Regulations<ITAG tagnum="52">NUCLEAR REGULATORY COMMISSION </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">10 CFR Part 2 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="91">RIN 3150-AC22, 3150-AA05 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Rules of Practice for Domestic Licensing Proceedings_Procedural Changesin the Hearing Process </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Nuclear Regulatory Commission. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Final rule. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>The Nuclear Regulatory Commission is amending its Rulesof Practice to improve the hearing process with due regard for the rightsof the parties. The amendments require a person seeking to participateas a party in an NRC proceeding to file a list of contentions with thepresiding officer together with a brief explanation of the bases for eachcontention, a concise statement of the alleged facts or expert opinionthat support the contention and which, at the time of the filing, the personintends to rely upon in proving the contention at the hearing, and referencesto the specific sources and documents of which the person is aware andupon which he or she intends to rely to establish such facts or expertopinions. The information submitted by a potential intervenor must be sufficientto show that a genuine dispute exists between it and the applicant or licenseeon an issue of law or fact. If the person fails to satisfy these requirementsthe presiding officer shall not admit the contention. Other amendmentsare made to reduce unnecessary discovery, to describe procedures by whicha presiding officer may require parties to file a description of the purposeand nature of questions which they intend to ask witnesses during cross-examination,to expand the time during which motions to dispose of contentions summarilyand without a hearing may be filed, and to limit an intervenor's appealsand filings of proposed findings of fact and conclusions of law to issueswhich that party actually placed in controversy or sought to place in controversyin the proceeding. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>EFFECTIVE DATE: </T2>September 11, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT: </T2>Stuart A. Treby, Assistant GeneralCounsel, Rulemaking and Fuel Cycle Division, Office of the General Counsel,U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission, Washington, DC 20555; Telephone (301)492-1636. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION</T2><ITAG tagnum="84">I. Background </ITAG>On July 3, 1986, after extensive study, evaluation and review and carefulconsideration of prior public comments,1<NOTE/> the Commission published a notice of proposed rulemakingstating that it was considering amending certain provisions of its rulesof practice in order to improve the licensing process for nuclear powerplants and inviting public comment (51 FR 24365, July 3, 1986.) The proposedamendments, which were initially developed by the Regulatory Reform TaskForce, addressed specific aspects of the hearings process: Admission ofcontentions; discovery against NRC staff; use of cross-examination plans;timing of motions for summary disposition; and limitations on intervenors'filings of proposed findings of fact, conclusions of law, and appellatebriefs. In addition to these proposals, the Commission also requested commentson a series of related proposals developed by former Commissioner Asselstineconcerning the intervention process. The comment period expired October17, 1986. More than 150 comments, including a few late-filed comments,were received from electric utilities, electric utility and nuclear powerassociations or their counsel, utility stockholders, counsel for NRC licensees,an architect-engineer, intervenors in NRC proceedings, public interestgroups, states, local governments, Indian tribes and interested individuals.Copies of all comments received are available for public inspection, andcopying for a fee, at the NRC Public Document Room at 2120 L Street, NW.,lower level, Washington, DC. <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>1A detailed account of the background of this rulemaking isset out in the preamble of the proposed rule, <T3>see </T3>51 FR 24365-24366, July 3, 1986. <ITAG tagnum="84">II. Summary of Comments </ITAG>A. General Although objections were raised to some of the specific proposals, theproposed rule received broad support from electric utilities, their counseland various industry groups. According to these commenters, the proposedrule would streamline the hearing process and make it more efficient. States,local governments, public interest groups, intervenors and individualsgenerally opposed the proposals on the ground that they would curtail thepublic's role in the licensing process and meaningful public participationin licensing proceedings would be eliminated. Noting the need for and importanceof unbiased factual information in reaching sound regulatory decisionsand the effectiveness of intervenors in identifying and obtaining fullconsideration of vital health and safety issues, these commenters expressedthe view that opportunities for full public participation in the licensingprocess should be expanded, not reduced. Some commenters questioned theneed for the proposed changes. Others stated that the Commission's rulesof practice should be retained unchanged. B. Comments on Specific Proposals, with ResponsesThe sections which follow contain a description of each of the proposedamendments, a summary of the comments received and an NRC response.<ITAG tagnum="81">1. Intervention </ITAG>(10 CFR 2.714) Admission of Contentions The proposed amendments to 10 CFR 2.714 would raise the threshold for theadmission of contentions to require the proponent of the contention tosupply information showing the existence of a genuine dispute with theapplicant on an issue of law or fact. The required showing must includereferences to the specific portions of the application which are disputed.The contention must also be supported by a concise statement of the allegedfacts or expert opinion, together with specific sources and documents ofwhich the petitioner is aware, which will be relied on to establish thefacts or expert opinion. Absent this showing, the contention will not beadmitted. Under the proposed amendments, admission of a contention mayalso be refused if it appears unlikely that the petitioner can prove aset of facts in support of the contention or if it is determined that thecontention, even if proven, would be of no consequence in the proceedingbecause it would not entitle the petitioner to relief. Finally, the proposedamendments would provide that a contention raising only an issue of lawwill not be admitted for resolution in an evidentiary hearing but shallbe decided on the basis of briefs and any oral argument that may be held.Electric utilities, their counsel and industry groups, for the most part,supported this change, while environmental and citizen action groups andstate and local government representatives opposed the proposed amendmentsraising the threshold for the admission of contentions. Characterizing the proposed changes respecting the admission of contentionsas one of the most significant aspects of the proposed rule, the commenterswho favored adopting more stringent standards of admissibility stated thatthe Commission's existing procedures permitted too many insignificant,meritless, hypothetical and time-consuming contentions to be admitted andthat the proposed amendments would have the salutary effect of requiringpetitioners to know in advance of filing a petition to intervene what issuesthey intended to litigate and how they planned to conduct the litigation.In the opinion of some commenters, the proposed amendments, if vigorouslyenforced, could become an important tool in crystallizing disputes at anearly stage in the proceeding, thereby significantly improving the efficiencyand quality of the hearing process. The commenters noted that the proposedamendments should curtail the practice of using discovery procedures todevelop contentions and that the proposed amendments would bring NRC practicemore in line with Federal practice under the Administrative Procedure Act.The proposed amendments would also, in one respect, conform NRC practicemore closely to that permitted by the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure.On this point, one commenter noted the similarity between Rule 12(b)(6)of the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure and the provision in proposed andSection;2.714(d)(2)(iii) under which a presiding officer could refuse to admita contention upon a determination that the contention, if proven, wouldbe of no consequence in the proceeding because it would not entitle thepetitioner to relief. Some of the proponents of the proposed amendments expressed the view thatthe amendments should be further revised. Several commenters expressedthe view that the proposed amendments did not go far enough in that theyfailed to include more stringent requirements respecting standing. Severalcommenters questioned the propriety of admitting contentions based on disputeson issues of policy. In the opinion of these commenters, it would be inappropriatefor licensing and appeal boards to decide policy issues. Policy and disagreementsconcerning policy should be addressed by the Commission itself. Accordingto these commenters, to permit policy statements which have been formallyadopted by the Commission to be challenged in licensing and regulatoryproceedings devoted to other matters would be inconsistent with currentNRC practice (see 10 CFR 2.758) which precludes parties in any adjudicatoryproceeding involving initial licensing, except as provided in andSection;2.758 (b), (c) and (d), from challenging any Commission rule or regulation.Instead, concerns respecting Commission policies should be raised at thetime the Commission is actively engaged in developing and formulating thosepolicies in the forum provided by the Commission for that purpose. In response, the Commission would note that the use of the terms ``law,fact and policy'' was not meant to change in any manner the way Commissionregulations or policy statements are dealt with in NRC proceedings. Theterms were used merely to encompass the variety of issues, often mixedfactual, legal or policy issues, which can be the subject of contentionsin NRC proceedings. However, to avoid any ambiguity about the manner inwhich policy issues are to be dealt with before the NRC, the word ``policy''has been deleted from the final version of andSection; 2.714. Several commenters criticized the language used in paragraph (b)(2) ofandSection; 2.7l4 to describe the threshold of admissibility on the groundthat it was unnecessarily redundant because it included two separate standardsof admissibility, <T3>i.e., </T3>(1) the existence of a genuine dispute with the applicanton a material issue of law, fact or policy, and (2) the information presentedprompts reasonable minds to inquire further as to the validity of the contention.Some commenters opposed, while other commenters favored, inclusion of the``reasonable minds'' standard. One commenter noted that the genuine disputestandard is the same standard used to determine standing and that if thisstandard is applied as it has been in the past, adoption of the proposedamendments will have little practical effect. The Commission has concludedthat describing the threshold for admissibility by two different phrasesis unnecessary and could create confusion. Therefore the ``prompts reasonableminds to inquire further'' language has been deleted from the final rule.Commenters opposing the proposed amendments objected on the grounds thatthe proposed amendments were unnecessary, contrary to due process, undulyburdensome, unfair and in violation of the provisions of section 189a ofthe Atomic Energy Act of 1954, as amended. According to these commenters,the proposed standard for the admission of contentions is so restrictivethat it would be virtually impossible for persons seeking to participatein an NRC adjudicatory proceeding to succeed in having their contentionsadmitted with the result that significant safety issues might not be fullyexplored or carefully reviewed. Instead of sharpening the issues in dispute,the proposed amendments would simply eliminate certain issues from furtherconsideration with the result that the problems presented might never besatisfactorily resolved. This could be highly detrimental to the publichealth and safety. Asserting that the proposed standard for admissibility of contentions isfar more stringent than that applied by the Federal courts, the commentersargued that, if promulgated, the standard would have the effect of requiringpersons seeking to participate in an NRC proceeding to prepare and provetheir complete evidentiary case before any determination is made on theirright to be a party to the proceeding. Under the proposed procedures, severalcommenters argued, petitioners would not only be required to produce theproof of their alleged facts in order to be admitted to the proof-gatheringand fact-finding process; licensing boards would also be permitted to prejudgethe petitioner's evidence before the petitioner was granted standing toparticipate in the proceeding. Several commenters took strong exceptionto the provision in andSection; 2.714(d)(2)(ii) which would permit presidingofficers to bar an intervenor from participating in a proceeding on thebasis of a preliminary determination that ``it appears unlikely that petitionercan prove a set of facts in support of its contention.'' In the opinion of some commenters, the requirement that petitioners mustdocument and furnish evidence in support of their contentions before theyare entitled to participate in an adjudicatory proceeding and take advantageof the mechanisms normally available to parties to such a proceeding toobtain relevant documents and information is patently unfair and constitutesa denial of due process. In addition, they argue, contrary to the intentof the present regulatory scheme, one immediate effect of the proposedamendments would be to shift the burden of proof from the license applicantto the intervenor. The comments also noted that under the Commission'sregulations, license applicants are not required to furnish all the necessarydocumentation supporting the application at the time the application isfirst submitted. These circumstances, coupled with the more stringent standardfor the admission of contentions prescribed by the proposed amendments,would make it impossible for intervenors to prepare and litigate a fullydefinitive case. Some commenters also argue that to the extent that the proposed amendmentswould operate to bar intervenors from participating in NRC adjudicatoryproceedings, they would contravene the provisions of section 189a of theAtomic Energy Act of 1954, as amended, which states, in pertinent part:<ITAG tagnum="21">In any proceeding under this Act, for the granting, suspending, revoking,or amending of any license or construction permit, or application to transfercontrol, and in any proceeding for the issuance or modification of rulesand regulations dealing with the activities of licensees, and in any proceedingfor the payment of compensation, an award, or royalties under sections153, 157, 186c., or 188, the Commission shall grant a hearing upon therequest of any person whose interest may be affected by the proceeding,and shall admit any such person as a party to such proceeding * * * . </ITAG>The commenters also opposed the proposed amendments because, in their opinion,the amendments would, if adopted, create a hopeless state of confusionrespecting the matters to be considered in determining whether a personshould be entitled to participate in a proceeding and the matters to beconsidered in reaching a decision on the merits of the proceeding. In theirview, the standards used in deciding an issue on the merits are not appropriatefor deciding whether a particular person should be allowed to participatein a proceeding. The commenters also took exception to the cases citedin the preamble of the proposed rule in support of this proposal. Finally, some commenters objected to the proposed amendments on the groundsthat they are unnecessary. According to these commenters, presiding officershave adequate authority under the Commission's present rules of practiceto bar contentions which are frivolous and without merit. In general, whenan effort has been made to apply the existing requirements in a disciplinedmanner, presiding officers have experienced little difficulty in determiningwhether a particular contention is meritorious and should be admitted asan issue in the proceeding. The commenters are firmly of the view thatadditional amendments establishing more stringent standards for the admissionof contentions are unnecessary. The Commission disagrees with the assertions that the proposed amendmentsare unduly burdensome and so restrictive that it will be virtually impossiblefor persons to have safety contentions admitted to an NRC proceeding. Under these new rules an intervenor will have to provide a concise statementof the alleged facts or expert opinion which support the contention andon which, at the time of filing, the intervenor intends to rely in provingthe contention at hearing, together with references to the specific sourcesand documents of which the intervenor is aware and on which the intervenorintends to rely in establishing the validity of its contention. This requirementdoes not call upon the intervenor to make its case at this stage of theproceeding, but rather to indicate what facts or expert opinions, be itone fact or opinion or many, of which it is aware at that point in timewhich provide the basis for its contention. In addition to providing a statement of facts and sources, the new rulewill also require intervenors to submit with their list of contentionssufficient information (which may include the known significant facts describedabove) to show that a genuine dispute exists between the petitioner andthe applicant or the licensee on a material issue of law or fact. Thiswill require the intervenor to read the pertinent portions of the licenseapplication, including the Safety Analysis Report and the EnvironmentalReport, state the applicant's position and the petitioner's opposing view.Where the intervenor believes the application and supporting material donot address a relevant matter, it will be sufficient for the intervenorto explain why the application is deficient. The Commission does not agree that this rule contravenes section 189a ofthe Atomic Energy Act of 1954, as amended. A member of the public has noabsolute or unconditional right to intervene in a nuclear power plant licensingproceeding under the Atomic Energy Act. <T3>BPI</T3> v. <T3>Atomic Energy Commission, </T3>502 F.2d 424 (DC Cir. 1974). Section189a of the Act which provides for intervention is subject to the Commission'srulemaking power under section 161p and, thus, to reasonable proceduralrequirements designed to further the purposes of the Act. <T3>BPI</T3> v. <T3>Atomic Energy Commission, supra, </T3>502 F.2d at 427, 428; <T3>see also American Trucking Ass'ns, Inc.</T3> v. <T3>United States, </T3>627 F.2d 1313, 1320-23 (DC Cir. 1980). Furthermore,the right to intervention under section 189a for a member of the publicis explicitly conditioned upon a ``request.'' The proposed amendments would,in effect, provide that a ``proper request'' by a member of the publicshall include a statement of the facts supporting each contention togetherwith references to the sources and documents on which the intervenor reliesto establish those facts. Finally, the Administrative Procedure Act createsno independent right to intervene in nuclear licensing proceedings. See<T3>Easton Utilities Commission</T3> v. <T3>Atomic Energy Commission, </T3>424 F.2d 847, 852 (DC Cir. 1970)(enbanc); <T3>cf. National Coal Operators' Assn.</T3> v. <T3>Kleppe, </T3>423 U.S. 388, 398-99, 46 L. Ed. 2d 580, 96 S. Ct. 809(1976). Nor does the Commission believe that this requirement represents that substantiala departure from existing practice. Under the Commission's existing requirements,as explained by the Atomic Safety and Licensing Appeal Board, ``[A]n interventionpetitioner has an ironclad obligation to examine the publicly availabledocumentary material pertaining to the facility in question with sufficientcare to enable the petitioner to uncover any information that could serveas the foundation for a specific contention. Neither Section 189a of theAtomic Energy Act nor andSection; 2.714 of the Rules of Practice permitsthe filing of a vague, unparticularized contention, followed by an endeavorto flesh it out through discovery against the applicant or Staff.'' <T3>Duke Power Co. </T3>(Catawba Nuclear Station, Units 1 and 2), ALAB-687,16 NRC 460, 468 (1982); <T3>vacated in part on other grounds, </T3>CLI-83-19, 17 NRC 1041 (1983).<T3>See also Ohio</T3> v. <T3>NRC, </T3>814 F.2d 258 (6th Cir. 1987). Under the current requirementto provide the basis for a contention, a petitioner must provide some sortof minimal basis indicating the potential validity of the contention. ``Therequirement generally is fulfilled when the sponsor of an otherwise acceptablecontention provides a brief recitation of the factors underlying the contentionor references to documents and texts that provide such reasons.'' <T3>Texas Utilities Electric Co. </T3>(Comanche Peak Steam Electric Station,Unit 1), ALAB-868, 25 NRC 912, 930 (1987). The revised rule does, however,overturn the holdings of <T3>Mississippi Power and Light Co. </T3>(Grand Gulf Nuclear Station, Units1 and 2), ALAB-130, 6 AEC 423, 425-26 (1973) and <T3>Houston Lighting and Power Co. </T3>(Allens Creek Nuclear GeneratingStation, Unit 1), ALAB-590, 11 NRC 542, 546-49 (1980). The Appeal Boardfound in those cases that the current language of 10 CFR 2.714 does notrequire a petitioner to describe facts which would be offered in supportof a proposed contention. The new rule will require that a petitioner includein its submission some alleged fact or facts in support of its positionsufficient to indicate that a genuine issue of material fact or law exists.We reject the arguments that the new rule is unfair and a denial of dueprocess because it requires intervenors to allege facts in support of itscontention before the intervenor is entitled to discovery. Several monthsbefore contentions are filed, the applicant will have filed an applicationwith the Commission, accompanied by multi-volume safety and environmentalreports. These documents are available for public inspection and copyingin the Commission's headquarters and local public document rooms. Admittedintervenors will continue to be able to use discovery to develop the factsnecessary to support its case. However, the rule will require that beforea contention is admitted the intervenor have some factual basis for itsposition and that there exists a genuine dispute between it and the applicant.It is true that this will preclude a contention from being admitted wherean intervenor has no facts to support its position and where the intervenorcontemplates using discovery or cross-examination as a fishing expeditionwhich might produce relevant supporting facts. The Commission does notbelieve this is an appropriate use of discovery or cross-examination. <T3>BPI</T3> v. <T3>Atomic Energy Commission, </T3>502 F.2d 424, 429 (DC Cir. 1974). TheCommission believes it is a reasonable requirement that an intervenor beable to identify some facts at the time it proposes a contention to indicatethat a dispute exists between it and the applicant on a material issue.The Commission agrees with commenters that the new rule may require personsseeking intervention to do more work at an earlier stage of the proceedingthan under the current regulations. However, the Commission disagrees withthe conclusion reached by some commenters that the rule shifts the burdenof proof to potential intervenors or should be rejected because of theburden placed on potential intervenors. The revised rule does not shiftthe ultimate burden of persuasion on the question of whether the permitor license should be issued; it rests with the applicant. Rather, the ruleonly details what is expected of an intervenor as part of its burden ofcoming forward with information in support of a proposed contention. <T3>Cf. Consumers Power Co. </T3>(Midland Plant, Units 1 and 2), ALAB-123,6 AEC 331, 345 (1973). The Commission believes it to be a reasonable requirementthat before a person or organization is admitted to the proceeding it readthe portions of the application (including the applicant's safety and environmentalreports) that address the issues that are of concern to it and demonstratethat a dispute exists between it and the applicant on a material issueof fact or law. Many intervenors in NRC proceedings already ably do whatis intended by this requirement: they review the application before submittingcontentions, explain the basis for the contention by citing pertinent portionsand explaining why they have a disagreement with it. The Commission also disagrees with the comments that andSection; 2.714(b)(2)(iii)should permit the petitioner to show that it has a dispute with the Commissionstaff or that petitioners not be required to set forth facts in supportof contentions until the petitioner has access to NRC reports and documents.Apart from NEPA issues, which are specifically dealt with in the rule,a contention will not be admitted if the allegation is that the NRC staffhas not performed an adequate analysis. With the exception of NEPA issues,the sole focus of the hearing is on whether the application satisfies NRCregulatory requirements, rather than the adequacy of the NRC staff performance.See, <T3>e.g., Pacific Gas and Electric Co. </T3>(Diablo Canyon Nuclear PowerPlant, Units 1 and 2), ALAB-728, 17 NRC 777, 807, <T3>review declined, </T3>CLI-83-32, 18 NRC 1309 (1983).2<NOTE/> For this reason, and because the license application shouldinclude sufficient information to form a basis for contentions, we rejectcommenters' suggestions that intervenors not be required to set forth pertinentfacts until the staff has published its FES and SER. <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>2The Commission recognizes that in some cases the applicant'sand the NRC staff's position on a particular issue will be similar. Althoughunder these rules the contention must be framed to disagree with the applicant'sposition, an intervenor's evidentiary in the proceeding. For each issueappealed, the precise portion of the record relied upon in support of theassertion of error must also be provided. The new rule provides that in ruling on the admissibility of a contention,the presiding officer shall not admit a contention to the proceeding ifthe intervenor fails to set forth the contention with reasonable specificityor establish a basis for the contention. In addition, the contention willbe dismissed if the intervenor sets forth no facts or expert opinion onwhich it intends to rely to prove its contention, or if the contentionfails to establish that a genuine dispute exists between the intervenorand the applicant (or, possibly, the NRC staff on a NEPA issue). Contraryto the assertions of some commenters, the use of this standard for theadmission of contentions has been supported by the Federal courts in numerousinstances. <T3>Vermont Yankee Nuclear Power Corp.</T3> v. <T3>NRC, </T3>435 U.S. 519 (1978); <T3>Independent Bankers Ass'n</T3> v. <T3>Board of Governors, </T3>516 F.2d 1206 (D.C. Cir. 1975); <T3>Connecticut Bankers Ass'n</T3> v. <T3>Board of Governors, </T3>627 F.2d 245 (D.C. Cir. 1980). The court inthe latter case emphasized that ``a protestant does not become entitledto an evidentiary hearing merely on request, or on a bald or conclusoryallegation that such a dispute exists. The protestant must make a minimalshowing that material facts are in dispute, thereby demonstrating thatan ``inquiry in depth' is appropriate.'' 627 F.2d at 251. The Commission'srule is consistent with these decisions. Several commenters were concerned that the standard ``dispute on a genuineissue of material law or fact'' is the same one to be used by the presidingofficer in ruling on motions for summary judgment filed under 10 CFR 2.749.The Commission expects that at the contention filing stage the factualsupport necessary to show that a genuine dispute exists need not be inaffidavit or formal evidentiary form and need not be of the quality necessaryto withstand a summary disposition motion. At the summary disposition stagethe parties will likely have completed discovery and essentially will havedeveloped the evidentiary support for their positions on a contention.Accordingly, there is much less likelihood that substantial new informationwill be developed by the parties before the hearing. Therefore, the qualityof the evidentiary support provided in affidavits at the summary dispositionstage is expected to be of a higher level than at the contention filingstage. The proposed rule also provided in andSection; 2.714(d)(2) that the presidingofficer would refuse to admit a contention where: <ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) It appears unlikely that petitioner can prove a set of factsin support of its contention; or </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) The contention, if proven, would be of no consequence in theproceeding because it would not entitle petitioner to relief. </ITAG>The requirement in (iii) above was intended to parallel the standard fordismissing a claim under Rule 12(b)(6) of the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure.The intent of Rule 12(b)(6) is to permit dismissal of a claim where theplaintiff would be entitled to no relief under any set of facts which couldbe proved in support of his claim. A number of commenters disagreed with the language of proposed andSection;2.714(d)(2)(ii); specifically, the phrase ``appears unlikely'', becauseit suggests that the presiding officer is to prejudge the merits of a contentionbefore an intervenor has an opportunity to present a full case. The Commissionrecognizes the potential ambiguity of the proposed phrasing and the paragraphhas been deleted. Issues which arise under the National Environmental Policy Act (NEPA) arespecifically addressed in the new rule. NEPA requires the NRC to analyzethe environmental impact of its proposed major actions significantly affectingthe quality of the environment. In the licensing context, the NRC fulfillsthis obligation by issuance of a draft environmental impact statement (DES)and a final environmental impact statement (FES). Any license or permitapplication subject to NEPA's impact statement requirement must containa complete Environmental Report (ER) which is essentially the applicant'sproposal for the DES. (See 10 CFR 51.20 and 51.40). As described in andSection;2.714(b)(2)(iii), an intervenor will be required to demonstrate that agenuine dispute exists between it and the applicant or the staff on a materialissue of fact or law which relates to NEPA. Several commenters took exceptionto the provisions in paragraph (b)(2)(iii) of andSection; 2.714 relatingto environmental matters, claiming, among other things, that those provisionsappear to authorize petitioners to submit late-filed contentions basedon the NRC staff's environmental review documents. One commenter recommendedthat the discussion of NEPA issues in andSection; 2.714(b)(2)(iii) be deletedas unnecessary, noting the availability of a right, based on past precedents,to amend or supplement environmental documents to reflect new information.The commenters disagreed on whether contentions relating to environmentalmatters should focus on environmental reports submitted by the applicantor environmental documents prepared by the NRC staff. The Commission has reexamined those portions of andSection; 2.714(b)(2)(iii)which relate to the filing of environmental contentions in the light ofthese comments and has concluded that the text of the rule as presentlydrafted is clear and that no further revision is needed. The rule makesclear that to the extent an environmental issue is raised in the applicant'sER, an intervenor must file contentions on that document. The NRC staffin its DES or FES may well take a different position than the applicant.10 CFR 2.714(b)(2)(iii) explicitly recognizes for environmental mattersexisting precedent regarding the right to amend or supplement contentionsbased on new information. The Commission wishes to emphasize that theseamendments to andSection; 2.714(b)(2)(iii) are not intended to alter thestandards in andSection; 2.714(a) of its rules of practice as interpretedby NRC caselaw, <T3>e.g., Duke Power Co., </T3>(Catawba Nuclear Station, Units 1 and 2),CLI-83-19, 17 NRC 1041 (1983), respecting late-filed contentions nor arethey intended to exempt environmental matters as a class from the applicationof those standards. One commenter objected to the inclusion of the word ``concise'' in paragraph(b)(2)(ii) of andSection; 2.7l4 on the ground that it ``could be misconstruedas requiring brevity.'' The commenter added that a word or phrase whichconnotes sufficient detail to inform the reader of the various factualor other bases for the contention should be used instead. The Commission disagrees with the view of the commenter that retentionof the word ``concise'' in paragraph (b)(2)(ii) of andSection; 2.714 couldbe misleading. In the opinion of the Commission, paragraph (b)(2)(ii),when read in context with paragraphs (b)(2)(i) and (b)(2)(iii) of andSection;2.714, clearly identifies the kind of detailed information which a petitionermust provide to enable the Commission or the presiding officer to determinewhether a contention should be admitted in a particular adjudicatory proceeding.Several commenters suggested that paragraph (b)(2)(iii) of andSection; 2.714should require that the issue being raised is not only in dispute but isalso ``material'', that is, that the resolution of the dispute would makea difference in the outcome of the licensing proceeding. The Commissionconcurs that that was the intention of the requirement, as is demonstratedby the the language of paragraph (d)(2)(i) of andSection; 2.714, which providedfor ``determining whether a genuine dispute exists on a <T3>material </T3>issue'' of law or fact. Section 2.714(b)(2)(iii) hasbeen revised to include the word ``material''. One commenter expressed the view that there was very little likelihoodthat contentions involving purely legal issues would be submitted (in mostcases contentions raise mixed questions of law and fact) and thereforeparagraph (d)(2)(iv) of andSection; 2.7l4 is unnecessary and should be deleted.Another commenter disagreed with the form of andSection; 2.714(d)(2)(iv).As written, it conflicts with the proposed definition of a contention in10 CFR 2.714(b)(2) as a statement of ``<T3>law</T3>, fact or policy''. While not opposed to the intent of theproposal, the commenter recommended that this section be revised to readas follows: <ITAG tagnum="21">If the Commission, the presiding officer, or the Atomic Safety andLicensing Board designated to rule on the admissibility of contentionsdetermines that any of the admitted contentions constitute pure issuesof law, those contentions must be decided on the basis of briefs or oralargument according to a schedule determined by the Commission or the presidingofficer. </ITAG>The intent of the proposed rule in andSection; 2.714(d)(2)(iv) was that purelylegal contentions, which occur rarely, may be admitted as issues in theproceeding. However, they will not be a part of an evidentiary hearing,but rather, will be handled on the basis of briefs and oral arguments.A new paragraph (e) has been added to andSection; 2.714 to clarify this intention.The Commission is also making a clarifying change to 10 CFR 2.714(c). Thatparagraph provides that any party to a proceeding may file an answer toa petition to intervene within certain time periods. Prior to 1978, a personpetitioning to intervene in an NRC proceeding was required to state notonly how his or her interest might be affected by the results of the proceeding,but also the basis for his or her contentions with regard to each aspecton which he or she desired to intervene. Under that scheme for petitionsfor leave to intervene, it was clear that a response filed pursuant to10 CFR 2.714(c) could be a response to the contentions and the bases forany contentions proposed. In 1978, the Rules of Practice were amended toprovide that a petitioner could file his or her contentions separatelyin a supplement to the original petition to intervene, not later than fifteendays prior to the special prehearing conference held pursuant to 10 CFR2.751a or the first prehearing conference. Section 2.714(c) was not amendedto make it clear that answers to these supplemental petitions containingcontentions and their bases were permitted as well as to the original petitionto intervene. However, the practice before the Commission since 1978 hasbeen that answers to supplements to petitions to intervene as well as toan initial petition to intervene are permissible within the timeframe establishedin andSection; 2.714(c). Language is being added to andSection; 2.714(c) tomake it clear that answers to both initial petitions and any supplementsthereto are permissible. Former Commissioner Asselstine also suggested in the proposed rule additionalchanges in the Commission's rules on intervention and public participationin the licensing process. Changes to 10 CFR 2.104, 2.714, 2.751a and 2.752were proposed to require early publication of notice of receipt of an application,to specify the time within which petitions for intervention can be filed,to separate the decision on standing from the decision on the validityof contentions, to provide for a mandatory ninety day period of time todraft contentions, and to create a two stage screening process to determinewhether or not a genuine issue of a material fact exists with respect toeach contention. Those commenters who favored former Commissioner Asselstine's proposalsfelt they would improve the efficiency of the hearing process without imposingadditional burdens on intervenors. They were thought to be logical andeasy to understand and dealt with the fact that although the hearing clockbegins when an application is docketed, much of the documentation of interestto intervenors may not be ready for some time. Some commenters felt theproposals would encourage informal discussion and resolution of disputesand were generally more equitable and fair. Those commenting unfavorably on the Asselstine proposals felt they wouldexacerbate the current problems of instability and unpredictability inthe hearing process. The use of provisional admission and the notice ofreceipt proposals would only add additional steps to the hearing processwithout increasing its effectiveness. They felt presiding officers alreadyhave the authority to reject petitions for intervention prior to submissionof contentions and do so. These proposals would substantially increasethe number of parties and contentions without any countervailing benefit.Other commenters, although favoring the approach of Commissioner Asselstine,believed discovery should take place before contentions and that too muchdiscretion was being given to the presiding officer to dismiss contentions.The Commission has considered the comments on Commissioner Asselstine'sproposals and concluded that it does not wish to take any additional actionregarding these proposals at this time. Several of them address the sameaspects of the hearing process, <T3>e.g. </T3>the filing of contentions, as the proposed rule changes madeby the Commission, and, the Commission has chosen to adopt those rulesessentially as proposed. <ITAG tagnum="81">2. Subpoenas (10 CFR 2.720) Discovery Against NRC Staff </ITAG>The proposed amendments to 10 CFR 2.720(h)(2)(ii) would codify two existinggrounds used by NRC staff to object to responding to interrogatories fromparties in NRC adjudicatory proceedings. This change would enable the staffsimply to cite the provisions of the rule in objecting to a request, therebyconserving limited staff time and resources. The first ground for objectingreflects existing NRC practice in which a response stating that the requestedinformation is available in either NRC public document rooms or in publiccompilations and providing sufficient information to enable a party tolocate the material requested is considered adequate. The second groundwould limit the scope of an interrogatory by barring the requestor fromasking the NRC staff to explain its reasons for not using data, assumptionsand analyses where the NRC staff did not rely on this information in itsreview. Persons submitting interrogatories would also be prevented fromasking the staff to perform additional research or analytical work beyondthat needed to support the NRC staff's position on any particular matter.Requestors could continue to submit interrogatories seeking to elicit factualinformation reasonably related to the NRC staff's position in the proceeding,including data used, assumptions made and analyses performed by the NRCstaff. The commenters who supported the proposed amendments did so because theybelieved it would be advantageous if certain established and well recognizedprecedents commonly used in NRC adjudicatory proceedings were codifiedin NRC's Rules of Practice. According to the commenters, the perceivedadvantages of codification included conservation of increasingly limitedNRC staff resources, increased use of accepted legal procedures and reductionof delays in the application review process. One commenter stated thatthese procedures should not be limited to the NRC staff but that they shouldbe equally available to all parties to any NRC adjudicatory proceeding.Several commenters who opposed the rule, also made this comment. One commenter supported codification in principle but pointed out thatthe proposed amendments as presently drafted, do not accurately reflectexisting precedent. For example, the proposed amendments convert a statementindicating the availability of a document, long recognized as an acceptableresponse, into an acceptable rationale for not responding. The commenteralso took issue with the prohibition against the submittal of questionsrequesting the NRC staff to explain why it did not use certain alternativedata or assumptions or perform certain analyses. According to the commenter,questions of this type would not require the staff to perform additionalresearch; the staff need only respond by providing an explanation. The commenters who opposed placing additional restrictions on interrogatoriesto the NRC staff did so for a variety of reasons. Considered unfair, unnecessaryand unwise as a matter of policy, the proposed amendments were criticizedbecause they would defeat the basic purpose of discovery--to obtain relevantinformation on issues raised in and pivotal to the proceeding, therebypreventing surprise at trial. A number of commenters noted that the staff is a major if not crucial partybecause it is the party with the technical resources and expertise. Intervenorsneed full opportunity to understand and question the staff's position.Moreover, the staff should be held accountable for its actions. This proposalcould restrict the flow of information and would place the burden on intervenorsto locate information bearing on the staff's position. This would increaseintervention costs. The current rules provide ample protection for thestaff. If anything, discovery against the staff should be increased ratherthan decreased. A number of commenters opposed to the rule change expressed concerns similarto those described above made by supporters of the rule. They were concernedthat the proposed rule would improperly shield the staff from its obligationto explain and justify its position. The stated rationale for the rule--caselawon the issue of requiring extensive independent research--does not supportthe proposal in the view of one commenter. The staff may have examinedalternative assumptions, data and analyses and chosen not to rely on them.Interrogatories asking the staff to provide an explanation for why oneparticular source of data or analysis was chosen is fair discovery. Several commenters argued that parties are entitled to know not just thefacts supporting the staff's position but whatever facts are in the staff'spossession. It is unreasonable and unfair to limit discovery to informationthat supports the staff's position. Relevant facts which do not supportthe staff's final position could be concealed. A number of commenters were also critical of the assertion that this proposalwas an attempt to conserve staff resources. Several asserted that the existingrules already give the staff special status in responding to discovery.If the staff is to remain a full party, it should be equal not privileged.Commission arguments that this rule is necessary to preserve scarce staffresources are not consistent with positions previously taken with respectto other parties to NRC proceedings. The Commission has consistently takenthe view that parties are not excused from hearing obligations due to alack of resources. Inhibiting the flow of information is not an appropriateway to deal with scarce staff resources. The Commission should either seekadditional appropriations or eliminate party status for the staff. If the Commission wants to institutionalize the two objections discussedin the proposal they should be made applicable to all parties not justthe staff. Commenters representing applicants asserted that discovery againstthem has many of the same objectionable qualities--asking for documentsalready on the docket or requesting the applicant to perform new analyses.These commenters saw no justification for codifying the NRC caselaw solelyfor the benefit of the staff. A number of commenters were also critical of the second element of theproposed rule which would codify the existing NRC practice that an adequatediscovery response is to state that the requested information is availablein public document rooms or other public compilations. Several commentersnoted that this proposal does more than just codify existing practice.If that were all it did, the basis for it is weak, because citing a rulerather than caselaw is not a meaningful reduction in staff workload. Theproposal converts a method of response (citation to a specific document)into grounds for not responding. Under the proposed rule the LicensingBoard must determine if information is reasonably obtainable from the publicdocument room or another source. But the Licensing Board won't readilybe able to determine this on its own. The staff might as well respond atthe outset with the information which constitutes an adequate responseunder existing practice--title, page reference and location of document--ratherthan object and become involved in a round of pleadings to determine thestaff's duty to respond. Several commenters objected to the proposal because of the impact theyfelt it could have on specific types of proceedings. One commenter objectedto limitations on interrogatories to the staff in enforcement proceedingsregarding alternative assumptions and analyses not relied on. The concernwas that if the staff refused to rely on a particular analysis performedby the licensee or its contractor in determining compliance, litigationof the issue could be protracted if the staff were not required to addressit during discovery. The Commission has decided to adopt the proposed changes to its discoveryprocedures; however, the changes will apply to all parties to NRC proceedings,not just to the NRC staff. Because of this expanded applicability of thechanges, they are being incorporated into 10 CFR 2.740, the general provisionsgoverning discovery rather than into andSection; 2.720 as proposed. Commission caselaw has long established that while in response to a discoveryrequest a party must reveal information within its possession and control,which may entail some investigation to determine what information is inthe party's possession, the party is not required to engage in independentresearch. <T3>Pennsylvania Power and Light Co. </T3>(Susquehanna Steam Electric Station,Units 1 and 2, ALAB-613, 12 NRC 317, 334 (1980). The breadth of permissibleinterrogatories is limited to those which address factual information relatedto a party's position in the proceeding, such as data used, assumptionsmade, and analyses performed by the party. A party must provide the basis for its position on an issue in the proceeding,but the Commission does not believe that a party should be called uponthrough the discovery process to explain why it did not use other dataor be required to perform additional studies. Interrogatories which elicitwhat data the party has relied on and why are acceptable. Interrogatorieswhich ask a party to describe reasons why other data were not relied uponin developing a party's position will not be permissible. So long as priorto the trial, parties have an opportunity to learn what another party hasdone or what information that other party has to provide the basis forits position, the party seeking discovery will be able to show in the hearingwhat, in its view, the other party should have done or why its positionis incorrect. By eliminating burdensome interrogatories the Commissionwill conserve not only its own staff resources, but provide a fair hearingprocess for all parties. These principles are particularly important when applied to the NRC staff.To the extent that discovery elicits otherwise unavailable factual informationconcerning the basis for the staff's position on a particular issue ina proceeding, a party should be better prepared for trial. At the sametime, the staff should be able to produce the factual information requestedwith minimal disruption of its limited resources. Staff documents relevantto a proceeding are publicly available as a matter of course unless thereis a compelling justification for their nondisclosure. These publicly availabledocuments reasonably disclose the basis for the staff's position. Thusformal discovery against the staff may legitimately be narrowed to minimizestaff resources involved in time consuming discovery procedures. The second proposed change to discovery procedures does not, despite suggestionby some commenters to the contrary, add any new bases for objecting tointerrogatories. The change merely clarifies current practice that whena document is reasonably available from another source, such as the Commission'sPublic Document Room or local Public Document Room, the information neednot be provided in response to the interrogatory. A sufficient answer tosuch an interrogatory is the location, title and a page reference to therelevant document. <ITAG tagnum="81">3. Evidence (10 CFR 2.743) Cross-Examination </ITAG>The proposed amendment to 10 CFR 2.743 would require a party to a proceedingto obtain the permission of the presiding officer in order to conduct cross-examinationand would bar the presiding officer from considering any request to cross-examineunless the request was accompanied by a cross-examination plan containingspecified information. The required plan would include a brief descriptionof the issues on which cross-examination would be conducted and a proposedline of questions to achieve stated objectives together with the expectedanswers. The cross-examination plans would be kept confidential until thepresiding officer issued his or her decision. The commenters who supported the proposed amendments believed the requirementfor a plan would encourage parties to think out their case in advance andwould lead to better questions and a shorter proceeding. The proposed changeswould add structure to cross-examination and decrease repetitive and cumulativequestions. Some noted that cross-examination plans are essentially alreadystandard practice, while others indicated their belief that the proposedchanges would improve the Board's ability to control proceedings. One commenter,in supporting the proposal, noted that the NRC was within its authorityto limit cross-examination to cases where it is required for full and truedisclosure of the facts; nothing in the Atomic Energy Act or the AdministrativeProcedure Act guarantees an absolute right to cross-examine witnesses.<T3>Seacoast Anti-Pollution League</T3> v. <T3>Costle, </T3>572 F.2d 872, 880 (1st Cir. 1978); <T3>cert. denied, </T3>439 U.S. 824 (1978). Several of these same commenters believed the Commission's proposed changesdid not go far enough. One asserted that the proposal would not changethe hearing process but would only increase procedural requirements thatwill do little absent a vigilant presiding officer. The Commission shouldonly permit cross-examination if the points to be made could not be achievedby written testimony. Under such an approach, cross-examination would bereserved for impeaching credibility. Several suggested that a party's cross-examinationshould be limited to issues or contentions that the party had placed incontroversy. Another suggested that if more than one interested party hadraised an issue, lead responsibility for litigating it should be assignedto one party. One commenter stated that this proposal was so watered down from the Commission'searlier proposal in its Advanced Notice as to be almost meaningless. TheBoard should permit cross-examination only where, based on written evidence,there is a genuine and substantial issue of fact and resolution would besubstantially assisted by cross-examination. This commenter also believedthat the rule should provide for establishing time limits and noted thatrequiring and enforcing time limits is routine in Federal courts and otheradministrative agencies. Commenters opposed to the proposed rule had concerns both with the proposalas a whole and with specific aspects of it. Several asserted that cross-examinationis a fundamental right, and is especially important in NRC proceedingswhich deal with matters of public health and safety. In their view, thepublic interest in a full look at safety matters outweighs an interestin reducing a cluttered record. The proposal seeks to gain efficiency atthe expense of quality decision-making and the openness of the process.To restrict cross-examination is to negate the purpose of adjudicatoryproceedings--to adjudicate disputed facts. The purpose of cross-examinationis to explore credibility, inconsistency and bias. Effective cross-examinationrequires an element of surprise and the ability to shift direction. Onecommenter asserted that the stated reliance on caselaw is misplaced. Whilethe caselaw does support requiring parties to demonstrate the need forcross-examination, it has never suggested that barriers may be used toactively preclude the public litigant from participating. Several commenters argued that the proposal imposes a disproportionatelysevere impact on intervenors. Some argued that the proposed rule was ablatant attempt to limit the record to testimony prepared by applicantand staff who have the resources to file a large amount of direct testimony.Intervenors are more likely to make their case on cross-examination becausethey lack the resources to produce their own witnesses. A number of commenters also opposed the rule as unnecessary because theexisting rules, 10 CFR 2.718 and 2.757, are more than sufficient to controlcross-examination. The conduct of a hearing and the scope and amount ofcross-examination are traditionally within the presiding officer's discretion.One commenter noted that prefiled cross-examination plans are essentiallyalready standard practice. Another stated that such requirements are unnecessaryfor experienced counsel and unenforceable against others. Several notedthat the proposal could waste more time than it would save by creatinglitigation of the cross-examination plans and by creating a new area forappellate litigation. The remedy is for the board to control the hearing,not add new paperwork requirements on counsel. Another commenter took a slightly different approach in opposing the proposedrule. This commenter felt there were preferable means to limit argumentativeand unnecessary cross examination. Parties should be limited to litigatingonly their own contentions and only their stated interest in the contention.If parties have a common interest, their contentions may be jointly admittedand lead responsibility assigned for litigating the contention, includingcross-examination. Rather than develop more paperwork, the Commission shouldsimply reiterate that hearings be conducted in strict accordance with theNRC's evidentiary practice. One commenter questioned whether a Board in rejecting a cross-examinationplan would not be prejudging an issue because the presiding officer mightnot understand the party's overall litigation strategy. Another questionedwhether NRC can legally require a party to produce its workproduct to theBoard and ultimately to other parties. On the other side, one commenterexpressed concern that the filing of plans in confidence with the Boardcould unfairly influence the Board because parties could expound theirtheory of the case under the guise of describing objectives to be achievedduring cross-examination. One commenter argued that the proposed rule change violates the requirementsof the National Environmental Policy Act (NEPA) for full considerationof all environmental impacts of a decision to license a nuclear power plant.Another commenter asserted that it would violate due process requirementsif proceedings to impose civil penalties as well as other enforcement proceedingsare not excluded from the rule. Several objections to specific elements of the proposal were also noted.Many felt fifteen days to review prefiled testimony and prepare cross-examinationplans was insufficient. A number of commenters objected to the requirementthat the plans include not only questions but also the expected answersto questions. Most felt a statement of objectives and a proposed line ofquestions was sufficient for a Board to determine relevancy. If answersare required, then a party is in effect limited to asking questions forwhich he or she already knows the answers. A requirement for prefiled questionsand answers would unfairly limit the scope of cross-examination becauseit would not allow questioners to follow up on the unexpected. Cross-examinationis dynamic and litigants need the flexibility to try different tacks. Thelogical extension of the proposed requirement would be plans for redirectand recross-examination which would further delay a proceeding. Severalcommenters also noted their belief that this requirement could have a negativeimpact on discovery. They feared it could encourage a lack of full andprompt response to discovery by applicants in order to make it difficultfor intervenors to file adequate plans and, consequently, to conduct cross-examination.The Commission believes that cross examination plans can have a very beneficialimpact on the conduct of a hearing by encouraging parties to develop andevaluate the objectives they expect their cross-examination to achieveand by giving the presiding officer the necessary information to effectivelymanage the proceeding. The Commission disagrees with those commenters whobelieve that the use of cross-examination plans will sacrifice the qualityor openness of its decisionmaking for the sake of efficiency. Cross-examinationplans have been used effectively in a number of Commission proceedings.We do not believe it is unduly burdensome to require a party to a proceedingto examine prefiled testimony sufficiently to be able to articulate tothe presiding officer the nature of the questions the party believes arenecessary to illuminate the issues of concern to it. However, because theusefulness of this procedure is highly dependent upon the circumstancesof a particular proceeding, the final rule has been changed to give thePresiding Officer discretion to require submittal of the plans. The regulation makes clear that parties are entitled to conduct such cross-examination,in accordance with a plan if required by the Presiding Officer, as is necessaryfor full and true disclosure of the facts. This is the standard set forthin section 7(c) of the Administrative Procedure Act, 5 U.S.C. 556(d) andexisting andSection; 2.743(a). That provision has never been understood toconfer unfettered rights to cross-examine witnesses. <T3>See Seacoast Anti-Pollution League</T3> v. <T3>Costle, </T3>572 F.2d 872 (1st Cir. 1978); <T3>cert. denied, </T3>439 U.S. 824 (1978); <T3>Northern States Power Co. </T3>(Prairie Island Nuclear Generating Plant,Units 1 and 2), ALAB-244, 8 AEC 857, 867 n. 16 (1974), <T3>reconsideration denied, </T3>ALAB-252, 8 AEC 1175, aff'd., CLI-75-1,1 NRC 1 (1975). The standard in the rule will assure that issues are appropriatelyexamined and it is also consistent with the Commission's obligations underNEPA to consider the environmental impacts of a decision. We do not believe, as suggested by some commenters, that a more restrictivetest for cross-examination, <T3>e.g. </T3>where genuine and substantive issues will be substantiallyassisted by cross-examination, is appropriate. The option of requiringuse of cross-examination plans together with the discretion granted tothe presiding officer elsewhere in the regulations to limit unnecessary,argumentative or duplicative cross-examination provide adequate measuresto control the conduct of cross-examination. This regulation will not inhibit a party's ability to use the element ofsurprise or shift direction as the cross-examination progresses. When aplan is required, parties must submit objectives and a proposed line ofquestions. They are not required to submit all of the questions to be asked.If the objectives are sufficiently developed and described, there willbe no impediment to shifting the direction of questioning in response tothe answers received because the presiding officer will be aware of theultimate objective of the questioner or be able to ascertain through briefqueries of the cross-examiner why the change in direction is appropriate.It is also noted that the plans are required to be kept confidential bythe presiding officer. The Commission does agree with a number of commentersthat a requirement to include the postulated answers to the questions maycreate an unnecessary burden on the preparer of the plan. The intent ofthe requirement was to help the presiding officer understand more easilyhow the proposed line of questions would achieve the stated objective.We have concluded, however, that the statement of objectives can providesufficient notice to the presiding officer of the party's intentions andthe final rule deletes the requirement to include in the plan expectedresponses to proposed questions. Several commenters were also concerned that 15 days was insufficient timeto examine testimony and prepare cross-examination plans. Deleting therequirement to include postulated answers should eliminate much of thedifficulty which commenters identified for preparation of the plans. Therefore,we are retaining the 15 day prefiling requirement. However, language hasbeen added to andSection; 2.743(b)(2) to indicate that the schedule for filingcross-examination plans is to be established by the Presiding Officer.This will assure that the presiding officer will have sufficient time afterfiling of testimony but before the hearing to review the plans and makeany necessary rulings. It will also permit the Presiding Officer to accomodateany unique circumstances of a particular proceeding. Several commenters suggested that the Commission should impose strict limitson when cross-examination will be available, <T3>e.g., </T3>for impeaching credibility or where a genuine and substantiveissue is substantially assisted by cross-examination, and that it shouldlimit the issues on which an intervenor may cross-examine and assign leadresponsibility to a party when several have raised the same issues. Theagency's rules currently authorize a presiding officer to consolidate partiesand limit or consolidate cross-examination. 10 CFR 2.715a, 2.718 and 2.757.The Commission believes it is desirable to retain the presiding officer'sflexibility to decide whether such consolidation is appropriate and therefore,has not limited the presiding officer's discretion in this regard. One commenter noted that civil penalty and enforcement proceedings shouldbe excluded from these requirements. As drafted, proposed paragraph (b)(3)of andSection; 2.743 provided that paragraphs (b)(1) and (2) of the sectiondo not apply to proceedings under subpart B of this part for modification,suspension, or revocation of a license. This was intended to continue theexisting exemption for enforcement proceedings from requirements regardingprefiled testimony and provide a similar exemption concerning cross-examinationplans. The Commission agrees that civil penalty proceedings as an additionaltype of enforcement proceeding should be included within these exemptions.The final rule has been revised to clarify the intended exemptions andto include civil penalty proceedings within the exemptions. Several changes of a clarifying nature have been made to the rule as proposed.10 CFR 2.743(b)(2)(iii) has been modified to indicate that the presidingofficer is to keep the cross-examination plans in confidence until theinitial decision on the matter being litigated has been issued. The languagedescribing how the plans are to become part of the official record hasalso been clarified. <ITAG tagnum="81">4. Authority of Presiding Officer to Dispose of Certain Issues onthe Pleadings (10 CFR 2.749) Summary Disposition </ITAG>The proposed amendment to andSection; 2.749(a) would permit motions for summarydisposition to be filed at any time during the proceeding, including duringthe hearing. Current rules provide that summary disposition motions shallbe filed within such time as may be fixed by the presiding officer andalso provides that the presiding officer may dismiss motions filed shortlybefore the hearing commences if responding to or ruling on the motion woulddivert substantial resources from the hearing. The proposed change is intendedto give parties maximum flexibility to file such motions and to terminatelitigation at any point in the proceeding when it becomes apparent thatno genuine issue of material fact remains in dispute. Those commenters who favored the proposed change felt that it would helpsimplify and rationalize the hearing process by preventing unnecessarylitigation. Resolution of issues would be permitted at any point whereit became apparent further hearing is unnecessary. Thus, the proposal couldexpedite elimination of frivolous contentions. Another commenter pointedout that andSection; 2.749(c) would still be available to protect a partywho for valid reasons could not respond to a motion for summary disposition,and would thus provide sufficient protection against inopportune motions.Several commenters recommended that the proposal be clarified to providethat during a hearing, where cross-examination has not created a genuinedispute of fact and the intervenor has not called any witnesses, the Boardis empowered to grant summary disposition on the applicant's testimonyor the evidentiary record, without a requirement for supporting affidavits.Commenters opposing the proposed change generally felt that it would notincrease the effectiveness of the hearing process, but rather could resultin chaos and enormous inefficiencies during the hearing process. Severalcommenters were particularly concerned that this change would create theopportunity for harassing motions. Well-funded parties could overwhelmother parties with paperwork at crucial times. Several commenters feltthe change would be unfair to intervenors, who generally have fewer resourcesand rely on volunteers. Several indicated that time was needed before trialto prepare testimony and review that of others. If summary judgment motionscould be filed anytime, they could divert resources away from trial preparation.In addition, several expressed concern that motions could be filed beforediscovery was completed and before opponents of the motion could have obtainedinformation to respond to the motion. This could result in legitimate safetyissues being lost and never litigated. One commenter noted that this proposedchange constitutes a departure from Federal practice. The purpose of summaryjudgment is to eliminate issues from the evidentiary hearing; therefore,summary disposition motions are appropriately filed before a hearing begins.Once the hearing has started, use of summary judgment motions is more likelyto slow down rather than speed up the process. Another commenter noted that the rule change is unnecessary because thecurrent rule would permit summary judgment motions at all times if thepresiding officer permits. If the rule is changed, however, the commenterargued that the last sentence of the current 10 CFR 2.749(a) should beretained. It provides that the Board may summarily dismiss summary dispositionmotions if they are filed shortly before or during the hearing and wouldresult in a substantial diversion of resources. The commenter expressedconcern that without this sentence the presiding officer's authority tocontrol the hearing process would be diminished. The Board should be ableto dismiss or at least hold in abeyance motions filed during the hearingthat have the potential to disrupt the hearing. Summary disposition is a significant procedural tool to eliminate unnecessaryhearing time spent on testimony and cross-examination where no materialissues of fact remain in dispute. The Commission has evaluated the commentson summary disposition and continues to believe that the advantages forstreamlining the hearing process by explicitly permitting summary dispositionmotions to be filed at any time during the proceeding outweigh the potentialdisadvantages for the process. The Commission's regulations in 10 CFR 2.749(c)provide safeguards against potential abuses of the summary dispositionprocedures. A party who is unable to respond to such a motion because discoveryis incomplete may state his or her reasons in a response to the motionand the presiding officer may refuse to grant summary disposition or takeother appropriate action. The Commission believes that this provision providessufficient protection in those instances where a party opposing a motionfor summary disposition is unable to respond. However, the Commission recognizesthe validity of the concern expressed by several commenters that summarydisposition motions filed close to the start of or during a hearing havethe potential for prolonging the hearing. Therefore, a sentence has beenadded to 10 CFR 2.749(a) to give the presiding officer the discretion todismiss or hold in abeyance summary disposition motions which could divertsubstantial resources from the hearing and thereby prolong the hearingprocess. <ITAG tagnum="81">5. Proposed Findings and Conclusions (10 CFR 2.754) and Appeals tothe Commission From Initial Decisions (10 CFR 2.762) Limitations </ITAG>The proposed amendment to 10 CFR 2.754(c) would limit an intervenor's filingsof proposed findings of fact and conclusions of law to issues which thatparty actually placed in controversy or sought to place in controversyin the proceeding. The proposed amendment to 10 CFR 2.762(d) would similarlylimit the issues which an intervenor could raise in an appellate brief.Under current practice, a party may file proposed findings and conclusionsof law on any issue in the proceeding and may also appeal on all issuesin the proceeding. The only limitation is that a party must have a discernibleinterest in the outcome of the particular issue being considered. The purposeof the proposed change is to ensure that presiding officers and agencyappellate tribunals will be able to focus on disputed issues in a proceedingas presented and argued by parties with a primary interest in the issue.The change would also avoid having these officials inundated with filingsfrom persons with little or no stake in the resolution of a particularissue. The proposed amendments did not apply to the license applicant or the NRCstaff. Applicants have the burden of proof to demonstrate that the actionshould be taken and thus should be free to submit findings on all issueswhich could affect the Commission's decision to grant a license or to takean appeal from an adverse decision. The NRC staff has an overall interestin the proceeding to assure that the public health and safety and environmentalvalues are protected. Commenters supporting the change agreed that it would improve the hearingprocess and would contribute to the overall effort to streamline and makethe hearing process more efficient. Several indicated they felt this changehad considerable merit and would ensure that filings are submitted by partieswho have a real concern and interest in resolution of issues. One supporterof the proposal suggested that the current policy which permits appealsby a party on any issue whether they have litigated it or not is inconsistentwith the basic tenet of hearings to resolve disputes between specific parties.Redundant filings are unnecessary and generally not helpful. One commenter suggested that the Commission go further and preclude anintervenor from pursuing issues in which it has no cognizable interest.If this were done, there would be no need to place limits on cross-examinationor filings. Another suggested that the rule should also provide that anintervenor who fails to file proposed findings on an issue may not thereafterappeal the portion of the initial decision which deals with that issue.Comments by opponents of the proposed change focused on three main points.The first area concerned the discriminatory impact on intervenors and anasserted misperception on the part of the NRC of the role of intervenorsin NRC proceedings. Several asserted that the proposal was a denial ofdue process and one commenter stated that the Administrative ProcedureAct entitles all parties to a hearing to file proposed findings of factand conclusions of law. 5 U.S.C. 557(c). Several argued that there wasno logical explanation given for discriminating against intervenors. Theycalled attention to the fact that in its proposed rule the Commission acknowledgedthat intervenors have broad, generalized interests in protecting the healthand safety. This interest is akin to the same kind of interest which theCommission found to be justification for preserving the right of the NRCstaff to file proposed findings and conclusions of law. One commenter assertedthat the process of gaining admission as a party should be sufficient todismiss any allegations of a lack of a discernible interest in the outcomeof issues raised in the proceeding. Several commenters described the proposal as ``mysterious'' and confounding.In their view, the goal of the agency should be to compile as full a recordas possible for the decisionmakers; the NRC should not seek to limit theinformation it receives in any licensing proceeding. Findings and conclusionsdo not harm the decisionmaker and could be helpful. Another commenter notedthat the NRC currently has less than a dozen proceedings underway, suggestingthat the Hearing Boards are not overworked or overwhelmed by cases. Commentingspecifically on the limitation of appeals to issues litigated by a party,one person noted that an erroneous initial decision should be identifiedand corrected no matter who initially raised the issue of concern. A second focus of concerns was on the impact of such a change on NRC proceedings.A number of commenters suggested that the proposal would cause intervenorsto adopt each other's contentions and assert all issues in order to preservetheir rights. This could prolong the hearing and overwhelm hearings withthe volume of participation on an issue. The proposal would also make itdifficult for intervenors to work together, divide tasks and share theexpense of litigating issues. Such coordination now makes it possible forintervenors to financially bear the cost of litigation and reduces redundancyin the proceeding. Currently, intervenors may share issues and an intervenormay not participate fully knowing another intervenor is raising the issue.Under this proposal if a party subsequently fails to pursue an issue, otherintervenors would not have the opportunity to adopt the issue. Withoutthis opportunity, further consideration of issues would be blocked regardlessof how serious or meritorious they were. Also, because of the complex andtechnical nature of NRC's proceedings, an intervenor may discover it isinterested in an issue it did not identify initially. The proposal alsoignores the fact that each intervenor brings a different perspective tothe proceeding and can make a unique contribution through their filings.Boards should be able to judge these filings and give them such considerationas their quality merits. Finally, several commenters focused on the application of this proposalto an affected state. States bring a unique perspective to NRC proceedingsand should have the opportunity to submit filings. Otherwise, NRC couldbe deprived of valuable input from the party with the most interest ina particular issue. The State of Nevada indicated its view that under theNuclear Waste Policy Act, a host state or Indian tribe is to be accordedthe same status as the staff or an applicant. The proposed change wouldthus violate provisions of the NWPA. Another group of commenters, while generally favoring the proposal, disagreedwith the language which would permit filings and appeals on issues whichintervenors ``sought to place in controversy''. If an issue has not beenadmitted into the proceeding then no record will have been developed andno basis for proposed findings will exist. It is appropriate to allow anappeal and briefs on the basis that a contention was erroneously rejected.But this proposal would appear to allow appeals on a much broader basisand permit filings on the merits of the contentions. The Commission has reviewed the comments on the proposed changes to 10CFR 2.754 and 2.762. After consideration of the various arguments put forthby the commenters, the Commission is persuaded that the proposed changesshould be adopted. Limitations on proposed findings and appeals to issuesthat the intervenor actually placed in controversy or sought to place incontroversy will ensure that the parties and the adjudicatory tribunalsfocus their interests and adjudicatory resources on the contested issuesas presented and argued by the party with the primary interest in, andconcerns over, the issues. These sorts of limitations should also serveto reduce the paper burdens for the adjudicatory boards. We disagree withthe suggestion that the proposed limitations will cause intervenors toraise a multitude of issues or adopt each other's contentions in orderto preserve their rights, and thus, will prolong and overwhelm the hearingprocess with the attendant high level of participation on all issues. Thenew standards for admission of contentions that we are adopting as partof this rulemaking should serve to limit the degree to which any partycan gain admission of contentions that are frivolous or in which the partyhas little real interest. Moreover, existing andSection;andSection; 2.715aand 2.718 which authorize the presiding officer to consolidate parties,issues and adjudicatory presentations, can and should be used to limitunnecessary multi-party presentations and participation in the litigationof common contentions. The Commission has also examined the assertion that the proposed rule couldviolate a provision of the Administrative Procedure Act, 5 U.S.C. 557(c).That section provides that: <ITAG tagnum="21">``Before a recommended, initial, or tentative decision, or a decisionon agency review of the decision of subordinate employees, the partiesare entitled to a reasonable opportunity to submit for the considerationof the employees participating in the decisions--(1) proposed findingsor conclusions; or (2) exceptions to the decision or recommended decisionsof subordinate employees or to tentative agency decisions; and (3) supportingreasons for the exception or proposed findings or conclusions.'' </ITAG>There has been little analysis of this aspect of the APA in the case law;<T3>see, e.g., Klinestiver</T3> v. <T3>DEA, </T3>606 F2d. 1182 (D.C. Cir. 1979). While we recognize theremay be some uncertainty about the appropriate reading of section 557(c),we believe that the rule is in accord with the Administrative ProcedureAct because it preserves the opportunity for parties to file findings offact, conclusions of law, and exceptions to initial decisions with respectto those issues which the party has specifically raised as concerns inthe proceeding. Practice under the Commission's existing regulations hasbeen moving in the direction of a more carefully circumscribed appealsprocess. In <T3>Philadelphia Electric Co. </T3>(Limerick Generating Station, Units1 and 2), ALAB-845, 24 NRC 220 (1986), the Appeal Board concluded thatan intervenor which had limited its participation to certain technicalissues and had not participated in any aspect of litigation of emergencyplanning contentions did not have a right to appeal the Licensing Board'sdecision in connection with the applicant's emergency plan. ``Whether anintervenor has the right to pursue a particular issue on appeal is a functionof the level of interest expressed by the intervenor in such issue throughoutthe course of the proceeding.'' <T3>Id. </T3>at 253. We also note that the phrase ``sought to place in controversy'' was intendedto recognize that an appeal and briefs are permissible on the basis thata contention was erroneously rejected. The language was not intended toallow appeals on a broader basis or on the merits of the contentions notadmitted. In view of all of the above, the proposed amendment has been adopted. <ITAG tagnum="84">Miscellaneous Issues</ITAG>Several commenters included their views on other possible rule changesdiscussed by the Commission in its 1984 Request for Public Comment on RegulatoryReform Proposals (49 FR 14698, April 12, 1984) which preceded this proposedrule. Those proposals are not a part of this rulemaking. The Commissionevaluated comments on the 1984 proposals as part of the decision-makingprocess which led to the choice of the five proposed changes which constitutethis rulemaking. No further discussion of those initial proposals is necessary.Some commenters objected to the application of these changes to High LevelWaste (HLW) Licensing proceedings. The Commission has established the proceduresfor the HLW licensing proceeding in a final LSS rule which added a newsubpart J to 10 CFR part 2 (50 FR 14925, April 14, 1989). However, theCommission is now in the process of evaluating whether any additional modificationsare needed to these provisions. As part of its evaluation, the Commissionis considering whether any of the provisions in the final amendments onregulatory reform that would not already be included in subpart J by cross-reference,should be added to subpart J. Section 2.1000 of subpart J cross-referencesany sections of general applicability in subpart G of part 2 that willcontinue to apply to the HLW licensing proceeding. As such, all but oneof the provisions in the final regulatory reform rule (andSection; 2.714,which requires contentions to show that a genuine dispute exists on anissue of law or fact) will apply to the HLW proceeding. However, subpartJ contains a new provision on contentions, andSection; 2.1014, and consequentlyandSection; 2.714 would no longer apply to the HLW proceeding. The Commissionintends to evaluate the need to extend the ``genuine issue of fact'' standardto the HLW proceeding. A determination of such a need would result in theCommission proposing a rule amending 10 CFR 2.1014. As the Commission notedin the Supplementary Information to the final LSS rule -- <ITAG tagnum="21">* * * the Commission is committed to do everything it can to streamlineits licensing process and at the same time conduct a thorough safety reviewof the Department of Energy's application to construct a high-level wasterepository. The negotiators to this rulemaking have made a number of improvementsto our existing procedures. However, more improvements may be necessaryif the Commission is to meet the tight licensing deadline established bythe Nuclear Waste Policy Act of 1982, as amended. By publishing this rule,the Commission is not ruling out further changes to its rules of practice,including further changes to the rules contained in the negotiated rulemaking.(50 FR 14925, 14930, April 14, 1989). </ITAG>The revised rules do not apply to civil penalty proceedings conducted under10 CFR 2.205. Section 189a. of the Atomic Energy Act does not provide forthird parties to participate as ``interested persons'' in such proceedings.These amendments will take effect thirty days after publication in the<T4>Federal Register. </T4>The amendments will apply only to contentionsin proceedings initiated after that date. The Commission's rules and administrativedecisions interpreting those rules in existence prior to that date willbe applied to contentions filed in proceedings initiated prior to thatdate. <ITAG tagnum="84">Withdrawal of Earlier Rulemaking</ITAG>Commission published for public comment on June 8, 1981 (46 FR 30349) aproposed rule to make changes to elements of its Rules of Practice, includingseveral of the sections amended by this proceeding. Because the Commissionhas chosen to proceed with adoption of the changes to its Rules of Practiceincluded in this rulemaking, the earlier proposal is withdrawn. <ITAG tagnum="84">Environmental Impact: Categorical Exclusion</ITAG>The NRC has determined that this final rule is the type of action describedin categorical exclusion 10 CFR 51.22(c)(1). Therefore, neither an environmentalimpact statement nor an environmental assessment has been prepared forthis proposed regulation. <ITAG tagnum="84">Paperwork Reduction Act Statement</ITAG>This final rule contains no information collection requirements and thereforeis not subject to the requirements of the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980(44 U.S.C. 3501, et seq.). <ITAG tagnum="84">Regulatory Analysis </ITAG>The revisions to the Commission's Rules of Practice in 10 CFR part 2 improvethe effectiveness and efficiency of NRC proceedings with due considerationfor the rights of all participants. The changes to 10 CFR 2.714 requirethe proponent of a contention to submit sufficient factual informationto demonstrate the existence of a genuine dispute with the applicant orthe licensee or the NRC staff regarding a material issue of law or fact.This amendment ensures that the resources of all participants in NRC proceedingsare focused on real issues and disputes among the parties and thus it ispreferable to existing requirements. The revisions to 10 CFR 2.720 clarifyexisting practice that the staff may not be required: (1) To perform additionalresearch or analytical work beyond that required to support its position,or (2) to explain why it did not use alternative data, assumptions, oranalyses in its reviews. Codification of this requirement is preferableto relying on existing case law because it conserves resources that wouldotherwise have to be expended in opposing such discovery requests. Thefinal rule's provisions in 10 CFR 2.743 on cross-examination plans requirea party to obtain the permission of the presiding officer in order to conductcross-examination and bar the presiding officer from considering any suchrequest unless it is accompanied by a plan containing specific informationabout the nature and purpose of the proposed line of questioning. Whilethe use of cross-examination plans could have been left as a matter ofdiscretion for the presiding officer, the benefits from the use of suchplans, <T3>i.e., </T3>more focused and controlled hearings, favor making use ofsuch plans standard practice in NRC proceedings. The revision of 10 CFR2.749 permits the filing of motions for summary disposition at any timeduring a proceeding. The current practice leaves the timing for filingof such motions wholly within the discretion of the presiding officer.The final rule is preferable to continuing the present practice becausemaking it explicit that summary disposition motions may be filed at anytime during the proceeding encourages the use of such procedures wheneveran issue can be disposed of without a hearing. Since November 1981 a number of alternative changes to improve the hearingprocess have been evaluated by the Regulatory Reform Task Force, the SeniorAdvisory Group (NRC personnel), the Ad Hoc Committee for the Review ofNuclear Reactor Licensing Reform Proposals (non-NRC persons with experiencein the licensing process) and through the Request for Public Comment onRegulatory Reform Proposal published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>on April 12, 1984 (49 FR 14698). This final ruleimproves the efficiency and effectiveness of NRC's hearing process whilemaintaining due regard for the rights of affected parties and thus is thepreferred alternative. This rule does not have a significant impact onState and local governments and geographical regions, public health andsafety, or the environment; nor does it represent substantial costs tolicensees, the NRC, or other Federal agencies. This constitutes the regulatoryanalysis for this rule. <ITAG tagnum="84">Regulatory Flexibility Certification </ITAG>This final rule does not have a significant economic impact upon a substantialnumber of small entities. The amendments modify the Commission's rulesof practice and procedure. Most entities seeking or holding constructionpermits or Commission licenses that would be subject to the revised provisionswould not fall within the definition of small businesses found in section34 of the Small Business Act, 15 U.S.C. 632, in the Small Business SizeStandards set out in regulations issued by the Small Business Administrationat 13 CFR part 121, or in the NRC's size standards published December 9,1985 (50 FR 50241). Although intervenors subject to the provisions likelywould fall within the pertinent Small Business Act definition, the impacton intervenors or potential intervenors will be neutral. While intervenorsor potential intervenors will have to meet a higher threshold to gain admissionto NRC proceedings and, thereby incur some additional economic costs inpreparing requests for hearing or requests to intervene, these costs shouldbe offset by a reduction in intervenors' costs once the hearing commencesbecause information developed to support admission to the proceeding willbe used during the conduct of the proceeding. Thus, in accordance withthe Regulatory Flexibility Act, 5 U.S.C. 605(b), the NRC hereby certifiesthat this rule does not have a significant economic impact upon a substantialnumber of small entities. <ITAG tagnum="84">Backfit Analysis </ITAG>This final rule does not modify or add to systems, structures, components,or design of a facility; the design approval or manufacturing license fora facility; or the procedures or organization required to design, construct,or operate a facility. Accordingly, no backfit analysis pursuant to 10CFR 50.109(c) is required for this final rule. <ITAG tagnum="84"><T4>List of Subjects in 10 CFR Part 2 </T4></ITAG>Administrative practice and procedure, Antitrust, Byproduct material, Classifiedinformation, Environmental protection, Nuclear materials, Nuclear powerplants and reactors, Penalty, Sex discrimination, Source material, Specialnuclear material, Waste treatment and disposal. For the reasons set out in the preamble and under the authority of theAtomic Energy Act of 1954, as amended, the Energy Reorganization Act of1974, as amended, and 5 U.S.C. 553, the Nuclear Regulatory Commission isadopting the following amendments to 10 CFR part 2. <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 2_RULES OF PRACTICE FOR DOMESTIC LICENSING PROCEEDINGS </ITAG>1. The authority citation for part 2 continues to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Secs. 161, 181, 68 Stat. 948, 953, as amended (42 U.S.C.2201, 2231); sec. 191, as amended, Pub. L. 87-615, 76 Stat. 409 (42 U.S.C.2241); sec. 201, 88 Stat. 1242, as amended (42 U.S.C. 5841); 5 U.S.C. 552.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Section 2.101 also issued under secs. 53, 62, 63, 81, 103, 104, 105,68 Stat. 930, 932, 933, 935, 936, 937, 938, as amended (42 U.S.C. 2073,2092, 2093, 2111, 2133, 2134, 2135); sec. 102, Pub. L. 91-190, 83 Stat.853, as amended (42 U.S.C. 4332); sec. 301, 88 Stat. 1248 (42 U.S.C. 5871).Sections 2.102, 2.103, 2.104, 2.105, 2.721 also issued under secs. 102,103, 104, 105, 183, 189, 68 Stat. 936, 937, 938, 954, 955, as amended (42U.S.C. 2132, 2133, 2134, 2135, 2233, 2239). Section 2.105 also issued underPub. L. 97-415, 96 Stat. 2073 (42 U.S.C. 2239). Sections 2.200-2.206 alsoissued under secs. 186, 234, 68 Stat. 955, 83 Stat. 444, as amended (42U.S.C. 2236, 2282); sec. 206, 88 Stat 1246 (42 U.S.C. 5846). Sections 2.600-2.606also issued under sec. 102, Pub. L. 91-190, 83 Stat. 853, as amended (42U.S.C. 4332). Sections 2.700a, 2.719 also issued under 5 U.S.C. 554. Sections2.754, 2.760, 2.770, 2.780 also issued under 5 U.S.C. 557. Section 2.764and Table 1A of Appendix C also issued under secs. 135, 141, Pub. L. 97-425,96 Stat. 2232, 2241 (42 U.S.C. 10155, 10161). Section 2.790 also issuedunder sec. 103, 68 Stat. 936, as amended (42 U.S.C. 2133) and 5 U.S.C.552. Sections 2.800 and 2.808 also issued under 5 U.S.C. 553. Section 2.809also issued under 5 U.S.C. 553 and sec. 29, Pub. L. 85-256, 71 Stat. 579,as amended (42 U.S.C. 2039). Subpart K also issued under sec. 189, 68 Stat.955 (42 U.S.C. 2239); sec. 134, Pub. L. 97-425, 96 Stat. 2230 (42 U.S.C.10154). Subpart L also issued under sec. 189, 68 Stat. 955 (42 U.S.C. 2239).Appendix A also issued under sec. 6, Pub. L. 91-560, 84 Stat. 1473 (42U.S.C. 2135). Appendix B also issued under sec. 10, Pub. L. 99-240, 99Stat. 1842 (42 U.S.C. 2021b et seq.). </ITAG>2. In andSection; 2.714, paragraphs (e) through (h) are redesignated as paragraphs(f) through (i). In paragraphs (a) and (g) of andSection; 2.714, the words``paragraph (d) of this section'' which appear in the fourth sentence ofparagraph (a)(1), in the single sentence in paragraph (a)(2) and in thesingle sentence in paragraph (g) are revised to read ``paragraph (d)(1)of this section.'' Paragraphs (b), (c), and (d) of andSection; 2.714 arealso revised and a new paragraph (e) is added to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2.714</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Intervention. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(b)(1) Not later than fifteen (15) days prior to the holding of the specialprehearing conference pursuant to andSection; 2.751a, or if no special prehearingconference is held, fifteen (15) days prior to the holding of the firstprehearing conference, the petitioner shall file a supplement to his orher petition to intervene that must include a list of the contentions whichpetitioner seeks to have litigated in the hearing. A petitioner who failsto file a supplement that satisfies the requirements of paragraph (b)(2)of this section with respect to at least one contention will not be permittedto participate as a party. Additional time for filing the supplement maybe granted based upon a balancing of the factors in paragraph (a)(1) ofthis section. (2) Each contention must consist of a specific statement of the issue oflaw or fact to be raised or controverted. In addition, the petitioner shallprovide the following information with respect to each contention: (i) A brief explanation of the bases of the contention. (ii) A concise statement of the alleged facts or expert opinion which supportthe contention and on which the petitioner intends to rely in proving thecontention at the hearing, together with references to those specific sourcesand documents of which the petitioner is aware and on which the petitionerintends to rely to establish those facts or expert opinion.(iii) Sufficient information (which may include information pursuant toparagraphs (b)(2)(i) and (ii) of this section) to show that a genuine disputeexists with the applicant on a material issue of law or fact. This showingmust include references to the specific portions of the application (includingthe applicant's environmental report and safety report) that the petitionerdisputes and the supporting reasons for each dispute, or, if the petitionerbelieves that the application fails to contain information on a relevantmatter as required by law, the identification of each failure and the supportingreasons for the petitioner's belief. On issues arising under the NationalEnvironmental Policy Act, the petitioner shall file contentions based onthe applicant's environmental report. The petitioner can amend those contentionsor file new contentions if there are data or conclusions in the NRC draftor final environmental impact statement, environmental assessment, or anysupplements relating thereto, that differ significantly from the data orconclusions in the applicant's document. (c) Any party to a proceeding may file an answer to a petition for leaveto intervene or a supplement thereto within ten (10) days after serviceof the petition or supplement, with particular attention to the factorsset forth in paragraph (d)(1) of this section. The staff may file suchan answer within fifteen (15) days after service of the petition or supplement.(d) The Commission, the presiding officer, or the Atomic Safety and LicensingBoard designated to rule on petitions to intervene and/or requests forhearing shall permit intervention, in any hearing on an application fora license to receive and possess high-level radioactive waste at a geologicrepository operations area, by the State in which such area is locatedand by any affected Indian Tribe as defined in part 60 of this chapter.In all other circumstances, such ruling body or officer shall, in rulingon-- (1) A petition for leave to intervene or a request for a hearing, considerthe following factors, among other things: (i) The nature of the petitioner's right under the Act to be made a partyto the proceeding. (ii) The nature and extent of the petitioner's property, financial, orother interest in the proceeding. (iii) The possible effect of any order that may be entered in the proceedingon the petitioner's interest. (2) The admissibility of a contention, refuse to admit a contention if:(i) The contention and supporting material fail to satisfy the requirementsof paragraph (b)(2) of this section; or (ii) The contention, if proven, would be of no consequence in the proceedingbecause it would not entitle petitioner to relief. (e) If the Commission or the presiding officer determines that any of theadmitted contentions constitute pure issues of law, those contentions mustbe decided on the basis of briefs or oral argument according to a scheduledetermined by the Commission or presiding officer. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>3. In andSection; 2.740, paragraph (b)(1) is revised and a new paragraph(b)(3) is added to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2.740</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General provisions governing discovery.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(b)(1) <T3>In general. </T3>Parties may obtain discovery regarding any matter,not privileged, which is relevant to the subject matter involved in theproceeding, whether it relates to the claim or defense of any other party,including the existence, description, nature, custody, condition, and locationof any books, documents, or other tangible things and the identity andlocation of persons having knowledge of any discoverable matter. Whereany book, document or other tangible thing sought is reasonably availablefrom another source, such as from the Commission's Public Document Roomor local Public Document Room, a sufficient response to an interrogatoryinvolving such materials would be the location, the title and a page referenceto the relevant book, document or tangible thing. In a proceeding on anapplication for a construction permit or an operating license for a productionor utilization facility, discovery shall begin only after the prehearingconference provided for in andSection; 2.751a and shall relate only to thosematters in controversy which have been identified by the Commission orthe presiding officer in the prehearing order entered at the conclusionof that prehearing conference. In such a proceeding, no discovery shallbe had after the beginning of the prehearing conference held pursuant toandSection; 2.752 except upon leave of the presiding officer upon good causeshown. It is not ground for objection that the information sought willbe inadmissible at the hearing if the information sought appears reasonablycalculated to lead to the discovery of admissible evidence. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(b)(3) While interrogatories may seek to elicit factual information reasonablyrelated to a party's position in the proceeding, including data used, assumptionsmade, and analyses performed by the party, such interrogatories may notbe addressed to, or be construed to require: (A) Reasons for not usingalternative data, assumptions, and analyses where the alternative data,assumptions, and analyses were not relied on in developing the party'sposition; or (B) Performance of additional research or analytical workbeyond that which is needed to support the party's position on any particularmatter. 4. In andSection; 2.743, paragraphs (a) and (b) are revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2.743</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Evidence. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>Every party to a proceeding shall have the right to presentsuch oral or documentary evidence and rebuttal evidence and to conduct,in accordance with an approved cross-examination plan that contains theinformation specified in paragraph (b)(2) of this section if so directedby the presiding officer, such cross-examination as may be required forfull and true disclosure of the facts. (b)(1) <T3>Testimony and cross-examination. </T3>The parties shall submit directtestimony of witnesses in written form, unless otherwise ordered by thepresiding officer on the basis of objections presented. In any proceedingin which advance written testimony is to be used, each party shall servecopies of its proposed written testimony on each other party at least fifteen(15) days in advance of the session of the hearing at which its testimonyis to be presented. The presiding officer may permit the introduction ofwritten testimony not so served, either with the consent of all partiespresent or after they have had a reasonable opportunity to examine it.Written testimony must be incorporated into the transcript of the recordas if read or, in the discretion of the presiding officer, may be offeredand admitted in evidence as an exhibit. (2) The presiding officer may require a party seeking an opportunity tocross-examine to request permission to do so in accordance with a scheduleestablished by the presiding officer. A request to conduct cross-examinationshall be accompanied by a cross-examination plan that contains the followinginformation: (i) A brief description of the issue or issues on which cross-examinationwill be conducted; (ii) The objective to be achieved by cross-examination; and (iii) The proposed line of questions that may logically lead to achievingthe objective of the cross-examination. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">The cross-examination plan may be submitted only to the presidingofficer and must be kept by the presiding officer in confidence until issuanceof the initial decision on the issue being litigated. The presiding officershall then provide each cross-examination plan to the Commission's Secretaryfor inclusion in the official record of the proceeding. (3) Paragraphs (b)(1) and (2) of this section do not apply to proceedingsunder subpart B of this part for modification, suspension, or revocationof a license or to proceedings for imposition of a civil penalty.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>5. In andSection; 2.749, paragraph (a) is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2.749</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Authority of presiding officer to dispose of certain issues on thepleadings. </ITAG>(a) Any party to a proceeding may move, with or without supporting affidavits,for a decision by the presiding officer in that party's favor as to allor any part of the matters involved in the proceeding. The moving partyshall annex to the motion a separate, short, and concise statement of thematerial facts as to which the moving party contends that there is no genuineissue to be heard. Motions may be filed at any time. Any other party mayserve an answer supporting or opposing the motion, with or without affidavits,within twenty (20) days after service of the motion. The party shall annexto any answer opposing the motion a separate, short, and concise statementof the material facts as to which it is contended there exists a genuineissue to be heard. All material facts set forth in the statement requiredto be served by the moving party will be deemed to be admitted unless controvertedby the statement required to be served by the opposing party. The opposingparty may, within ten (10) days after service, respond in writing to newfacts and arguments presented in any statement filed in support of themotion. No further supporting statements or responses thereto may be entertained.The presiding officer may dismiss summarily or hold in abeyance motionsfiled shortly before the hearing commences or during the hearing if theother parties or the presiding officer would be required to divert substantialresources from the hearing in order to respond adequately to the motionand thereby extend the proceeding. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>6. In andSection; 2.754, paragraph (c) is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2.754</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Proposed findings and conclusions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(c) Proposed findings of fact must be clearly and concisely set forth innumbered paragraphs and must be confined to the material issues of factpresented on the record, with exact citations to the transcript of recordand exhibits in support of each proposed finding. Proposed conclusionsof law must be set forth in numbered paragraphs as to all material issuesof law or discretion presented on the record. An intervenor's proposedfindings of fact and conclusions of law must be confined to issues whichthat party placed in controversy or sought to place in controversy in theproceeding. 7. In andSection; 2.762, paragraph (d) is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2.762</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Appeals to the Commission from initial decisions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(d) <T3>Brief Content. </T3>A brief in excess of ten (10) pages must containa table of contents, with page references, and a table of cases (alphabeticallyarranged), statutes, regulations, and other authorities cited, with referencesto the pages of the brief where they are cited. (1) An appellant's brief must clearly identify the errors of fact or lawthat are the subject of the appeal. An intervenor-appellant's brief mustbe confined to issues which the intervenor-appellant placed in controversyor sought to place in controversy in the proceeding. For each issue appealed,the precise portion of the record relied upon in support of the assertionof error must also be provided. (2) Each responsive brief must contain a reference to the precise portionof the record which supports each factual assertion made. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Dated at Rockville, Maryland, this 2d day of August 1989. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">For the Nuclear Regulatory Commission. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Samuel J. Chilk, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Secretary of the Commission. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-18542 Filed 8-10-89; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 7590-01-D</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>